Utah statutes.
39-6-34.   Military court -- Challenge for cause -- Peremptory challenge.
(1)  The military judge and members of a military court may be challenged by
the accused or the trial counsel for cause stated to the court.  The military
judge of the court shall determine the relevancy and validity of challenges
for cause, and may not receive a challenge to more than one person at a time.
Challenges by the trial counsel shall be presented and decided before those by
the accused are offered, unless the judge determines otherwise.
(2)  Each accused and the trial counsel are entitled to one peremptory
challenge, but the military judge may not be challenged except for cause.  The
military judge in his discretion may grant additional peremptory challenges
where appropriate.
